Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB53.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 512 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful release of balloons when, within a twenty-four (24)
hour period, he or she intentionally releases, organizes the release of, or causes
to be released ten (10) or more balloons inflated with a gas that is lighter than air
except for:
(a) Balloons released on behalf of a governmental agency or pursuant to a
governmental contract for scientific or meteorological purposes;
(b) Hot air balloons that are recovered after launching; or
(c) Balloons released indoors.
(2) Unlawful release of balloons is a Class A misdemeanor.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 12/23/2024 2:15 PM Jacketed